indomorph/ben/nouns.lexc
!!! nouns.lexc !!!

! Noun morphology for Bengali

Multichar_Symbols ^GUESSNOUNSTEM +Guess +N +Nom +Acc +Dat +At +Gen +Cl1 +Cl2 +Cl3 +Cl4 +Cl5 +Cl6 +Cl7 +Cl8

LEXICON Root
0:0     NounStem ;

LEXICON Dessinence
+N:0        Classifier ;
+N:0        Case ;

LEXICON Classifier
+Cl1:খানা	Case;
+Cl2:খানি	Case;
+Cl3:গুলো	Case;
+Cl4:গুলি	Case;
+Cl5:টুকু	Case;
+Cl6:যোন	Case;
+Cl7:টা		Case;
+CL8:টি		Case;

LEXICON Case
! Nominative Case
+Nom+Sg:0	# ; ! 0
+Nom+Pl:রা	 # ; ! ra
+Nom+Pl:েরঅ     # ; ! era
+Nom+Pl:য়েরা   # ; ! d͡ʒera
+Nom+Pl+NonHum:গুলো	 # ; ! ɡulo
+Nom+Pl+NonHum:গুলি	 # ; ! ɡuli

! Objective Case
+Acc+Sg:কে  # ; ! ke
+Acc+Sg:রে	 # ; ! re
+Acc+Sg:এরা	 # ; ! er
+Acc+Pl:ডের	 # ; ! der
+Acc+Pl:এডের	 # ; ! eder
+Acc+Pl:দিগ	 # ; ! diɡɔ
+Acc+Pl:ডেরকে	 # ; ! derke
+Acc+Pl:এডেরকে	 # ; ! ederke
+Acc+Pl:দিগকে	 # ; ! diɡɔke
+Acc+Pl+NonHum:গুলোকে	 # ; ! ɡuloke
+Acc+Pl+NonHum:গুলিকে	 # ; ! ɡulike

! Genitive Case
+Gen+Sg:এর	 # ; ! er
+Gen+Sg:র	 # ; ! r
+Gen+Sg:য়ের      # ; ! d͡ʒer
+Gen+Pl:ডের	 # ; ! der
+Gen+Pl:এডের	 # ; ! eder
+Gen+Pl:দিগের	 # ; ! diɡer
+Gen+Pl+NonHum:গুলির	 # ; ! ɡulir
+Gen+Pl+NonHum:গুলোর	 # ; ! ɡulor

! Locative Case
+At+Sg:তে	 # ; ! te
+At+Sg:য়       # ; ! d͡ʒɔ
+At+Sg:য়ে      # ; ! d͡ʒe
+At+Sg:ে	 # ; ! e
+At+Sg:এ        # ; ! e
+At+Pl+NonHum:গুলোতে	 # ; ! ɡulote
+At+Pl+NonHum:গুলিতে	 # ; ! ɡulite

LEXICON NounStem
অগভীরতা Dessinence ; ! shallowness
অঙ্গুলাঙ্ক Dessinence ; ! finger-print
অতিসম্পৃক্তি Dessinence ; ! over-saturation
অধিরোহণী Dessinence ; ! a flight of steps ; a ladder
অনিদ্রা Dessinence ; ! sleeplessness ; insomnia
অনুমোদক Dessinence ; ! one who approves or sanctions ; one who authorizes
অন্তর্বীজ Dessinence ; ! kernel
অপব্যয় Dessinence ; ! wrongful or imprudent spend ing ; waste
অবঘাত Dessinence ; ! a fatal blow ; unnatural death
অবিলম্ব Dessinence ; ! absence of delay ; promptness
অভিশংসক Dessinence ; ! a public prosecutor
অয়নচলন Dessinence ; ! precession
অর্ধেক Dessinence ; ! One half ; moiety
অষ্টকোণ Dessinence ; ! an octagon
অসীমকাল Dessinence ; ! time infinite
আউলিয়া Dessinence ; ! Moslem saint
আগমনিবন্ধ Dessinence ; ! incoming or inward register
আতশ Dessinence ; ! fire works
আদানপ্রদান Dessinence ; ! giving and taking ; exchange
আপনি Dessinence ; ! one's own self
আমন্ত্রয়িতা Dessinence ; ! an inviter ; a host
আরোহপ্রণালী Dessinence ; ! inductive method
আশ্রয়দাতা Dessinence ; ! One who gives shelter ; protector
ইঞ্জিনিয়ার Dessinence ; ! an engineer
ইসলাম Dessinence ; ! Islam ; the Islamic race, Mus lim
উঠতি Dessinence ; ! rise
উদ Dessinence ; ! the other
উন্নতিসাধন Dessinence ; ! Improvement ; betterment
উপযাচন Dessinence ; ! act of volunteering
উমেদারি Dessinence ; ! soliciting for a job etc. ; offer ing oneself as a candidate
ঋতুপরিবর্তন Dessinence ; ! change of season
এটে Dessinence ; ! Thick root of the plantain tree ; rump
ওয়েবসাইট Dessinence ; ! website
কড়া Dessinence ; ! Pan ; cauldron
কপটবন্ধু Dessinence ; ! a false friend
করকমল Dessinence ; ! a hand conceived as a lotus
কর্মজীবন Dessinence ; ! active part of one's life ; service life
কল্যাণ Dessinence ; ! welfare, good, benefit ; well-be ing
কাচনল Dessinence ; ! glass cylinder, glass tube
কাপ Dessinence ; ! cap
কারু Dessinence ; ! an artisan ; a craftsman
কালিয়দমন Dessinence ; ! subdual of Kaliya by Lord Krishna ; Lord Krishna
কুঁড়া Dessinence ; ! bran
কুপাত্র Dessinence ; ! an unworthy husband or bridegroom
কুশল Dessinence ; ! well-being, weal
কৃষ্ণসর্প Dessinence ; ! a venomous black snake
কোচওয়ান Dessinence ; ! a coachman
ক্রতুপুরুষ Dessinence ; ! an appellation of Vishnu ; the Kratu appellation of Vishnu
ক্ষত্রিয়াণী Dessinence ; ! Kshatriya woman. fem
খট্বাশ Dessinence ; ! the polecat ; the civet cat
খাজানা Dessinence ; ! Revenue ; rent
খুঁত Dessinence ; ! a scar ; an ugly mark
খোকা Dessinence ; ! Male infant ; male child
গণনায়ক Dessinence ; ! a leader of the people
গম্ভীরতা Dessinence ; ! gravity, solemnity ; affectation or expression of importance
গাঙ্গেয় Dessinence ; ! the son of the Ganges
গিরিসংকট Dessinence ; ! a gorge
গুম্ফ Dessinence ; ! moustache ; a bunch
গেলা Dessinence ; ! drinking or swallowing
গোরস Dessinence ; ! cowmilk ; any cowmilk product
গ্রাফাইট Dessinence ; ! Graphite
ঘষামাজা Dessinence ; ! correction and brushing up ; act of scouring
ঘোল Dessinence ; ! whey, buttermilk
চতুষ্পদী Dessinence ; ! a four-lined or four-footed stanza
চলচিত্ততা Dessinence ; ! fickle-mindedness
চারটা Dessinence ; ! four.  four o'clock
চিত্রগন্ধ Dessinence ; ! sweet fragrance ; the yellow orpiment
চুল Dessinence ; ! hair
ছক Dessinence ; ! a check of a checker-board ; a checker-board
ছায়াপথ Dessinence ; ! The Milky way ; galaxy
জগঝম্প Dessinence ; ! a war-drum ; a kettle-drum
জনিত্র Dessinence ; ! a producing machine, a plant
জলদস্যু Dessinence ; ! a pirate
জাতিবিদ্বেষ Dessinence ; ! race-hatred
জিঞ্জির Dessinence ; ! Chain ; shackles
জেটি Dessinence ; ! a jetty
জ্যেষ্ঠতা Dessinence ; ! Priority of birth ; primogeniture
ঝুলনা Dessinence ; ! a rocking cradle
টীম Dessinence ; ! team ; link
ঠেলা Dessinence ; ! a shove, a push ; a difficulty or a difficult task
ডেকচি Dessinence ; ! a metallic cooking pail
তত্ত্বজ্ঞান Dessinence ; ! knowledge about God ; theological or spiritual or philosophical knowledge
তরিবত Dessinence ; ! etiquette ; demeanour
তাপগ্রহণ Dessinence ; ! absorption of heat
তির Dessinence ; ! an arrow
তৃষ্ণা Dessinence ; ! thirst
ত্রিকাস্হি Dessinence ; ! the sacrum
দখলকারী Dessinence ; ! occupant ; occupier
দর্পণ Dessinence ; ! mirror, a looking-glass
দানধর্ম Dessinence ; ! the virtue of charity
দিদি Dessinence ; ! fem an elder sister or cousin ; a lady
দুকুল Dessinence ; ! the paternal and the maternal lines ; both alternatives
দূরদর্শিতা Dessinence ; ! Prudence ; providence
দেবশর্মা Dessinence ; ! a general surname used of Brahmans
দোচালা Dessinence ; ! Thatched hut with two slanting roofs ; roof sloping in either direction
দ্বীপবাসী Dessinence ; ! an islander
ধনুর্ধর Dessinence ; ! an archer, a bowman ; a very capable or efficient man
ধর্মাধিকারী Dessinence ; ! a judge
ধুয়া Dessinence ; ! Burden of a song ; refrain
নখরেখা Dessinence ; ! a mark caused by nail
নবী Dessinence ; ! Muhammadan prophet
নাকানিচুবানি Dessinence ; ! Ducking ; harassment
নারঙ্গ Dessinence ; ! the orange
নিদানবিদ্যা Dessinence ; ! aetiology ; diagnostics
নিরক্ষ Dessinence ; ! the equator, the equatorial region
নিশার্ধ Dessinence ; ! midnight ; dead of night
নুরজাহান Dessinence ; ! the light of the world
নৌসেনাবিভাগ Dessinence ; ! the navy, admiralty
পটকার Dessinence ; ! a painter ; a weaver
পদচারণ Dessinence ; ! pac ing ; strolling or walking
পরখ Dessinence ; ! test ; trial
পরার্থবাদ Dessinence ; ! altruism
পরিমাত্রা Dessinence ; ! intensity
পল্যয়ন Dessinence ; ! a saddle ; a caparison
পাং Dessinence ; ! pang
পাগড়িধারী Dessinence ; ! turbaned
পাদস্ফোট Dessinence ; ! chilblain ; kibe
পার্ষ্ণিগ্রাহ Dessinence ; ! an attack from the rear
পিত্তবিকার Dessinence ; ! biliary or bilious trouble or disorder
পুর Dessinence ; ! a house ; a city
পূর্বজা Dessinence ; ! an elder sister
পোতচালক Dessinence ; ! a captain ; a pilot
প্রজনন Dessinence ; ! reproduction
প্রতিযোগিতা Dessinence ; ! competition
প্রধানতা Dessinence ; ! primeness ; supremacy
প্রয়োগ Dessinence ; ! employment ; application
প্রাচুর্য Dessinence ; ! plenty, abundance ; affluence, milk and honey
প্রেতযোনি Dessinence ; ! an evil spirit
ফলাহার Dessinence ; ! act of eating fruit
ফুসকুড়ি Dessinence ; ! a vesicle ; a pimple,  a pustule
বঁইচি Dessinence ; ! a kind of small juicy berry
বদান্যতা Dessinence ; ! generosity
বয়ান Dessinence ; ! Explanation ; description
বলসামান্তরিক Dessinence ; ! a parrallelogram of forces
বহুলতা Dessinence ; ! muchness, profusion, abundance. plenty
বাঙালি Dessinence ; ! a native of Bengal
বাদশাহজাদি Dessinence ; ! a daughter of a badshah
বারণোপায় Dessinence ; ! a preventive measure
বাস্তুকর্ম Dessinence ; ! build ing-construction ; public works
বিজয়োল্লাস Dessinence ; ! Triumph
বিধায়ক Dessinence ; ! a member of a legislative assembly
বিভঙ্গ Dessinence ; ! method
বিলাসতরণী Dessinence ; ! a pleasure-boat
বিষুবলম্ব Dessinence ; ! the declination
বৃংহণ Dessinence ; ! the call of the elephant
বৈয়াকরণিক Dessinence ; ! a grammarian
ব্রহ্মদেশ Dessinence ; ! Burma
ভাড়াটিয়া Dessinence ; ! tenant ; renter
ভূমিরাজস্ব Dessinence ; ! land revenue
মণিক Dessinence ; ! mineral
মন্হনী Dessinence ; ! a churning-stick ; a churningpot
মহারাত্রি Dessinence ; ! midnight ; a solemn night
মাপন Dessinence ; ! measuring or weighing or sounding
মুখরা Dessinence ; ! atermagant, a vixen
মেটুলি Dessinence ; ! the liver of a goat
যমরাজ Dessinence ; ! King Yama the lord of death
রক্তিমা Dessinence ; ! redness ; red or crimson glow
রাজপুত্র Dessinence ; ! Prince
রেচন Dessinence ; ! evacuation of bowels ; excretion
লাঙল Dessinence ; ! a plough
শতকে Dessinence ; ! hundred ; aggregate of a hundred things
শাসক Dessinence ; ! dictator
শুভাশীর্বাদ Dessinence ; ! kind blessing or benediction
ষট্ষষ্টি Dessinence ; ! sixty-six
সঞ্চয়িতা Dessinence ; ! an anthologist ; selected works
সময়সীমা Dessinence ; ! time limit ; deadline
সর্বজ্ঞতা Dessinence ; ! omniscience
সামন্তরিক-সূত্র Dessinence ; ! the parallelogram of forces
সুড়ঙ্গ Dessinence ; ! Tunnel ; hole
সেনানী Dessinence ; ! an army commander, a general ; the army
স্ফটিকীভবন Dessinence ; ! crystallisation
স্রোত Dessinence ; ! a stream ; a current
হাড়গিলা Dessinence ; ! the adjutant stork
